Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Chapter 60. Costs and Attorney Fees; Settlements.

Collateral references. —

20 Am. Jur. 2d, Costs, § 1 et seq.

20 C.J.S., Costs, § 1 et seq.

Allowance of costs in litigation by beneficiary respecting trust, on theory that fund was created or preserved, 9 ALR2d 1150.

Allowance of costs in litigation by beneficiary for partition of trust property, 9 ALR2d 1219.

Allowance of fees for guardian ad litem appointed for infant defendant, as costs, 30 A.L.R.2d 1148.

Costs in action for removal of trustee of voting trust, 34 ALR2d 1142.

Unsuccessful litigant’s payment of costs as barring his right to appeal from judgment on merits, 39 ALR2d 194.

Appealability of order or judgment awarding or denying costs but making no other adjudication, 54 ALR2d 927.

Depositions, costs and fees as affected by Rule 30(b) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, and similar state statutes and rules, relating to preventing, limiting, or terminating the taking of, 70 ALR2d 758.

Liability of state, or its agency or board, for costs in civil action to which it is a party, 72 ALR2d 1379.

Taxation of costs and expenses in proceedings for discovery or inspection, 76 ALR2d 953.

Allowance as costs, of such items as maps, models, wall charts, photographs, and the like, 97 ALR2d 138.

Validity and construction of statute or rule allowing attorneys’ fees to out-of-state defendant successfully defending suit brought in state, 51 ALR3d 1336.

Right of indigent to proceed in marital action without payment of costs, 52 ALR3d 844.

Liability of parties to arbitration for costs, fees, and expenses, 57 ALR3d 633.

Dismissal of plaintiff’s action as entitling defendant to recover attorneys’ fees or costs as “prevailing party” or “successful party”, 66 ALR3d 1087.

Who is the “successful party” or “prevailing party” for purposes of awarding costs where both parties prevail on affirmative claims, 66 ALR3d 1115.

Construction and application of state statute or rule subjecting party making untrue allegations or denials to payment of costs or attorneys’ fees, 68 ALR3d 209.

Condemnor’s liability for cost of condemnee’s expert witnesses, 68 ALR3d 546.

Construction of provision, in compromise and settlement agreement for payment of costs as part of settlement, 71 ALR3d 909.

Right of party who is attorney and appears for himself to award of attorney’s fees against opposing party as element of cost, 78 ALR3d 1119.

Award of damages for dilatory tactics in prosecuting appeal in state court, 91 ALR3d 661.

Continuance of civil case as conditioned upon applicant’s payment of costs or expenses incurred by other party, 9 ALR4th 1144.

Allocation of defense costs between primary and excess insurance carriers, 19 ALR4th 107.

Propriety and effect of structured settlement whereby damages are paid in installments over a period of time, and attorneys’ fees arrangements in relation thereto, 31 ALR4th 95.

Construction, as to terms and conditions, of state statute or rule providing for voluntary dismissal without prejudice upon such terms and conditions as state court deems proper, 34 ALR4th 778.

Liability under state law for opposing party’s counsel fees, 56 ALR4th 486.

Cost of services provided by paralegals or the like as compensable elememt of award in state court, 73 ALR4th 938.

Recovery of attorneys’ fees and costs of litigation incurred as result of breach of agreement not to sue, 9 ALR5th 933.

Excessiveness or adequacy of attorneys’ fees in matters involving real estate, 10 ALR5th 448.

Recovery under state law of attorney’s fees by lay pro se litigant, 14 ALR5th 947.

Constitutionality, construction, and application of statutes, requiring bond or other security in taxpayers’ action, 41 ALR5th 47.

Measure and elements of damages for lessee’s breach of covenant as to repairs, 45 ALR5th 251.